test/src/morphology/N-alol_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - ålol: # -udda med stv och vokalv
    ålol+N+Sg+Nom: ålol
    ålol+N+Sg+Gen: ullula
    ålol+N+Sg+Acc: ullulav
    ålol+N+Sg+Ill: ullulij
    ålol+N+Sg+Ine: ulluln
    ålol+N+Sg+Ela: ullulist
    ålol+N+Sg+Com: ullulijn
    ålol+N+Pl+Nom: ullula
    ålol+N+Pl+Gen: ullulij
    ålol+N+Pl+Acc: ullulijt
    ålol+N+Pl+Ill: ullulijda
    ålol+N+Pl+Ine: ullulijn
    ålol+N+Pl+Ela: ullulijst
    ålol+N+Pl+Com: ullulij
    ålol+N+Ess: ullulin
    ålol+N+Abe: ullulahtá

 
 
